Wisconsin, session 2025, SB440.
do enact as follows:SB440,14Section 1. 13.92 (1) (b) 3. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB440,2,7513.92 (1) (b) 3. a. Promptly after the passage of any bill, any joint resolution 6amending the constitution, or any other resolution determined by the chief clerks to 1require enrollment and, in the case of a bill, before it is presented to the governor for 2approval, the chief clerk of the house in which the measure originated shall deliver 3the jacket to the bureau, which shall enroll the proposal and return the jacket and 4the required number of copies, including a camera-ready copy of any proposed 5constitutional amendment and each resolution requiring newspaper publication, to 6the chief clerk. The camera-ready original of the enrolled proposal shall be retained 7in the bureau.SB440,28Section 2. 35.17 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB440,2,12935.17 (1) In enrolling under s. 13.92 (1) (b) 3. and for publishing under ss. 1035.095, and 35.15, and 35.35 (1) (a), the legislative reference bureau shall correct 11minor clerical errors. No such correction shall be deemed an alteration of the 12enrolled copy.SB440,313Section 3. 35.35 (1) (a) of the statutes is repealed.SB440,414Section 4. 35.35 (1) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 35.35 (1).SB440,515Section 5. 985.08 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB440,3,416985.08 (2) (a) All legal notices shall be in Arial type face a sans serif typeface. 17A standard line shall be a 6-point Arial sans serif typeface on a 6-point leading 18without spacing between the lines, and 11 picas in length. One inch equals 6 19postscript pica and 72 postscript points. Nonstandard line lengths shall be allowed 20with adjustments in fees according to variations in line length. When the person or 21agency that places the notice elects not to use a 6-point Arial sans serif typeface, a 22larger Arial sans serif typeface up to 12 point may be used; in which case 23adjustment shall be made in line rate, proportionately decreasing for sizes of type 24over 6-point to produce the same net average compensation per column area. Such 1adjustments shall be evaluated by the department of administration, which shall 2certify the same to any newspaper, public official, or other interested party upon 3request, and such certification shall be presumptive evidence of the correct 4adjustments.SB440,3,55